Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.52.010

Declaration of purpose.

It is the purpose of this chapter to strengthen methods of administering employer-employee relations through the establishment of orderly methods of communication between academic employees and the college districts by which they are employed.

It is the purpose of this chapter to promote cooperative efforts by prescribing certain rights and obligations of the employees and employers and by establishing orderly procedures governing the relationship between the employees and their employers which procedures are designed to meet the special requirements and needs of public employment in higher education. It is the intent of this chapter to promote activity that includes the elements of open communication and access to information in a timely manner, with reasonable discussion and interpretation of that information. It is the further intent that such activity shall be characterized by mutual respect, integrity, reasonableness, and a desire on the part of the parties to address and resolve the points of concern.

[ 1991 c 238 s 145; 1987 c 314 s 1; 1971 ex.s. c 196 s 1.]